pl: Liczba oczek kanwy plastikowej: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Inne
sl-SI: Število očes na plastičnem platnu: Gostota 10; Gostota 12; Gostota 14; Gostota 16; Gostota 18; Gostota 5; Gostota 7; Drugo
de: Anzahl der Canvas-Maschen: 10-Count; 12-Count; 14-Count; 16-Count; 18-Count; 5-Count; 7-Count; Andere
ro-RO: Numărul de ochiuri al pânzei din plastic: 10 ochiuri; 12 ochiuri; 14 ochiuri; 16 ochiuri; 18 ochiuri; 5 ochiuri; 7 ochiuri; Altele
nl: Aantal plastic canvas mazen: 10-count; 12-count; 14-count; 16-count; 18-count; 5-count; 7-count; Overig
tr: Plastik kanvas ağ sayısı: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Diğer
hr-HR: Broj plastičnih mreža od platna: Gustoća 10; Gustoća 12; Gustoća 14; Gustoća 16; Gustoća 18; Gustoća 5; Gustoća 7; Ostalo
es: Densidad de malla del lienzo plástico: 10 puntos; 12 puntos; 14 puntos; 16 puntos; 18 puntos; 5 puntos; 7 puntos; Otro
th: จำนวนผ้าใบตาข่ายพลาสติก: 10 เคาต์; 12 เคาต์; 14 เคาต์; 16 เคาต์; 18 เคาต์; 5 เคาต์; 7 เคาต์; อื่นๆ
vi: Số lượng mắt lưới vải nhựa: 10 lỗ; 12 lỗ; 14 lỗ; 16 lỗ; 18 lỗ; 5 lỗ; 7 lỗ; Khác
pt-PT: Número de malhas de tela plástica: 10 pontos; 12 pontos; 14 pontos; 16 pontos; 18 pontos; 5 pontos; 7 pontos; Outro
fi: Muovikanavan silmämäärä: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Muu
pt-BR: Malhas de tela plástica número: Trama 10; Trama 12; Trama 14; Trama 16; Trama 18; Trama 5; Trama 7; Outro
en: Number of plastic canvas meshes: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Other
it: Numero di maglie della tela plastificata: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Altro
cs: Počet plastových sítěk: 10 ct; 12 ct; 14 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 5 ct; 7 ct; Ostatní
ko: 플라스틱 캔버스 메시 수: 10카운트; 12카운트; 14카운트; 16카운트; 18카운트; 5카운트; 7카운트; 기타
bg-BG: Брой отвори на пластмасовото платно: 10 каунт; 12 каунт; 14 каунт; 16 каунт; 18 каунт; 5 каунт; 7 каунт; Друго
sk-SK: Počet očiek plastového plátna: Veľkosť 10; Veľkosť 12; Veľkosť 14; Veľkosť 16; Veľkosť 18; Veľkosť 5; Veľkosť 7; Iné
ru: Количество ячеек пластиковой канвы: 10 каунт; 12 каунт; 14 каунт; 16 каунт; 18 каунт; 5 каунт; 7 каунт; Другое
lt-LT: Plastikinės drobės akių skaičius: 10 akelių; 12 akelių; 14 akelių; 16 akelių; 18 akelių; 5 akelių; 7 akelių; Kita
da: Masketal for plastkanvas: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Andet
fr: Nombre de mailles de la toile plastique: 10 points; 12 points; 14 points; 16 points; 18 points; 5 points; 7 points; Autre
nb: Antall plastduksnett: 10-count; 12-count; 14-count; 16-count; 18-count; 5-count; 7-count; Annet
zh-CN: 塑料帆布网眼数量: 10 支; 12 支; 14 支; 16 支; 18 支; 5 支; 7 支; 其他
hu: Műanyag vászonhálók száma: 10-es; 12-es; 14-es; 16-os; 18-as; 5-ös; 7-es; Egyéb
zh-TW: 塑膠畫布網目數: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; 其他
ja: プラスチックキャンバスメッシュの数: 10カウント; 12カウント; 14カウント; 16カウント; 18カウント; 5カウント; 7カウント; その他
el: Αριθμός πλαστικών πλεγμάτων καμβά: 10 count; 12 count; 14 count; 16 count; 18 count; 5 count; 7 count; Άλλο
sv: Maskantal för plastduk: 10-count; 12-count; 14-count; 16-count; 18-count; 5-count; 7-count; Övrigt